it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Accessori strumenti cucina > Accessori per set di fondue > Pasta combustibile da fondue: Taniche di combustibile per chafing; Taniche di combustibile per caminetti; Taniche di combustibile per fonduta; Taniche Sterno
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Phụ kiện đồ dùng nhà bếp > Phụ kiện bộ nấu lẩu pho mai > Nhiên liệu đun nấu dạng gel: Lon nhiên liệu Chafing; Lon nhiên liệu lò sưởi; Lon nhiên liệu đun nước xốt; Lon Sterno
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Acessórios de aparelhos domésticos > Acessórios para conjunto de fondue > Géis combustíveis: Recipientes para combustível de aquecimento; Recipientes para combustível de lareira; Recipientes para combustível de fondue; Recipientes Sterno
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych > Akcesoria do zestawów do fondue > Paliwa w żelu: Puszki z żelem etanolowym; Puszki z paliwem kominkowym; Puszki z paliwem do fondue; Puszki Sterno
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater > Tilbehør til fonduesett > Brennpasta: Brenselbokser for varmebeholdere; Brenselbokser for peis; Brenselbokser for fondue; Sternobokser
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器配件 > 瑞士火鍋組配件 > 酒精膏: 雙芯加熱燃罐; 壁爐燃罐; 火鍋燃罐; 加熱燃罐
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Dodatki za kuhinjske aparate > Dodatki za komplete za fondi > Gorilni geli: Posode za gorivo za grelne servirne posode; Posode za gorivo za kamin; Posode za gorivo za fondi; Posode za tekoče gorivo
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Acessórios para conjuntos de fondue > Combustíveis em gel para culinária: Latas de combustível para comida; Latas de combustível para lareira; Latas de combustível para fondue; Latas Sterno
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ σετ φοντί > Καύσιμα γέλης μαγειρικής: Δοχεία καυσίμου για σερβίρισμα; Δοχεία καυσίμου για τζάκια; Δοχεία καυσίμου Fondue; Δοχεία Sterno
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Zubehör für Küchengeräte > Fonduesetzubehör > Chafing Dish- & Fonduebrennpasten: Chafing-Brennkanister; Brennkanister für Kamine; Brennkanister für Fondue; Brennpastenkanister
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice de bucătărie > Accesorii set fondue > Combustibili pentru gătit sub formă de gel: Doze cu combustibil pentru menținerea temperaturii alimentelor; Doze cu combustibil pentru șemineuri; Doze cu combustibil pentru fondue; Doze Sterno
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Accessoires voor keukenmachines > Accessoires voor fonduesets > Brandpasta: Chafingbrandstofblikken; Haardbrandstofblikken; Fonduebrandstofblikken; Sterno-blikken
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları > Fondü Seti Aksesuarları > Jel Pişirme Yakıtları: Reşo Yakıt Kutuları; Şömine Yakıt Kutuları; Fondü Yakıt Kutuları; Sterno Kutuları
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 부대용품 > 퐁뒤 세트 부대용품 > 조리용 젤타입 연료: 뷔페용기 캔연료; 벽난로용 캔연료; 퐁뒤용 캔연료; STERNO 캔연료
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電関連用品 > フォンデュセット関連用品 > 調理用ジェル状着火剤: チェーフィング燃料缶; 暖炉用燃料缶; フォンデュ燃料缶; スターノ缶
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Accesorios para aparatos de cocina > Accesorios para juegos de fondue > Combustible en gel para cocinar: Latas de combustible; Latas de combustible para chimeneas; Latas de combustible para fondue; Latas de Sterno
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器配件 > 芝士火锅配件 > 凝胶燃料/固体酒精: 防擦燃料罐; 壁炉燃料罐; 芝士火锅燃料罐; 斯特诺冻胶燃料罐
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในครัว > ชุดหม้อฟองดูว์ > เชื้อเพลิงเจลสำหรับอุ่นอาหาร: กระป๋องเชื้อเพลิงไส้ตะเกียง; กระป๋องเชื้อเพลิงเตาผิง; กระป๋องเชื้อเพลิงฟองดู; กระป๋องสเตอร์โน
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské spotrebiče > Príslušenstvo pre fondue súpravu > Gélové palivá na varenie: Plechovky paliva do ohrievačov; Plechovky krbového paliva; Plechovky paliva pre fondue; Plechovky Sterno
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenapparater – tilbehør > Fonduesæt – tilbehør > Gelbaseret brændstof til madlavning: Brændstofdunke; Brændstofdunke til brændeovn; Brændstofdunke til fondue; Sternodåser
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Pribor za kuhinjske aparate > Kompleti pribora za fondue > Gel goriva za kuhanje: Limenke goriva za posude za održavanje topline; Limenke goriva za kamin; Limenke goriva za fondue; Limenke gorive paste
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires petit électroménager > Accessoires pour fondues > Gels combustibles de cuisine: Bidons de combustible à réchaud; Bidons de combustible de cheminée; Bidons de combustible à fondue; Bidons Sterno
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Tillbehör till köksapparater > Tillbehör till fondueset > Bränngel för matlagning: Bränsledunkar till varmhållningskärl; Bränsledunkar för öppen spis; Bränsledunkar för fondue; Sterno-burkar
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhaigép-kiegészítők > Fondue-készlet-kiegészítők > Főzőgél-üzemanyagok: Melegítő üzemanyagkannák; Kandalló üzemanyagkannák; Fondue üzemanyagkannák; Sterno-kannák
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Аксесоари за кухненски уреди > Аксесоари за фондю > Готварски гел горива: Кутии с гел горене за затопляне на храна; Кутии с гел за горене за камини; Кутии с гел за горене за фондю; Готварски горива Sterno
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliance Accessories > Fondue Set Accessories > Cooking Gel Fuels: Chafing Fuel Cans; Fireplace Fuel Cans; Fondue Fuel Cans; Sterno Cans
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství > Sady na fondue – příslušenství > Hořlavé pasty pro ohřev jídla: Palivové plechovky pro udržování teploty pokrmů; Palivové plechovky pro krby; Palivové plechovky pro fondue; Plechovky Sterno
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet > Fondue-setin lisätarvikkeet > Polttogeelit ruuanlaittoon: Kannelliset polttoastiat; Soihtupolttoastiat; Fonduepolttoaineet; Sterno-astiat
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Аксессуары для кухонной техники > Аксессуары для наборов для фондю > Горючие гели для приготовления: Банки с горючим гелем для жаровен; Банки с горючим гелем для каминов; Банки с горючим гелем для фондю; Банки с горючим гелем Sterno
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisų priedai > Fondiu rinkinių priedai > Gelinis kuras maistui gaminti: Maisto šildymo kuro skardinės; Židinio kuro skardinės; Fondiu kuro skardinės; „Sterno“ skardinės